Massachusetts, session 194th, S347.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 15 of chapter 76 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by deleting the second paragraph and inserting in place
thereof the following paragraph:
“A child shall be admitted to school upon certification (a “Medical Certification”) by a
physician that he or she has personally examined such child and that in his or her opinion the
totality of the child’s medical circumstances is such that the child’s health would be endangered
by such vaccination or by any of such immunizations. Such opinion may be based upon such
factors as are deemed relevant by the physician in his or her independent medical judgment
including, among other factors, concerns regarding an increased risk of adverse events, family
history, or exacerbation of pre-existing medical conditions relating to the child. The Medical
Certification shall be submitted at the beginning of each school year to the physician in charge of
the school health program. Medical Certifications shall be confidential, shall not be disclosed to
of 2

any person outside of the school health program, and shall not be admissible as evidence in any
action of any kind before any court, tribunal or agency without express, written consent of the
child’s parent or guardian. In the absence of manifest bad faith, a physician who provides a
Medical Certification shall not be subject to disciplinary action by any governing or licensing
authority. Medical Certifications may not be used to change or negatively affect a physician’s
rating or standing with an employer, insurer, hospital affiliation or academic affiliation.”
of 2